Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 5
IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS AND SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS

32-11.5-501. Improvement districts, special assessments, and bonds - general authority of district.

Subject to the election requirements specified in section 32-11.5-205 (2)(c)(II) and the procedural and other requirements of this part 5, the district may create one or more improvement districts, levy special assessments against all of the assessable property in an improvement district, and cause the assessments to be collected to defray wholly or in part the cost of acquiring, constructing, or improving one or more projects. Subject to the election requirements specified in section 32-11.5-205 (2)(c)(II), the district may also issue bonds to be repaid from the revenues generated by special assessments and, if applicable, any other moneys pledged to secure the payment of the bonds.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 864, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-502. Initiating procedure.

The procedure for acquiring, constructing, or improving any project to be funded in whole or in part with revenues generated by special assessments can be initiated by the provisional order method described in subsection (2) of this section or the petition method described in subsection (3) of this section.

Whenever the board determines that the interest of the district requires any project to be funded in whole or in part with revenues generated by special assessments, the board, by resolution approved by a supermajority vote as specified in section 32-11.5-204 (1)(b)(II), shall direct the engineer to prepare:

Preliminary plans showing:

A typical section of the contemplated project; and

The types of material, approximate thickness, and width;

A preliminary estimate of the total cost of the project; and

An assessment plat showing:

The area to be assessed; and

The amount of maximum benefits estimated to be assessed against each tract.

The resolution of the board shall describe the project in general terms but may provide for one or more types of construction, and the engineer shall separately estimate the cost of each type of construction. The estimate may be made in a lump sum or by unit process, as deemed most appropriate by the engineer for the completed facilities.

The resolution of the board shall state:

What part or portion of the expense of the described project is of special benefit and is to be paid for with revenues generated by special assessments;

What part of the project, if any, has been or is proposed to be funded with revenues generated from sources other than special assessments; and

The basis by which the cost of the project will be apportioned and special assessments will be levied.

In case a special assessment is not to be made according to front feet, the resolution of the board shall:

By apt description designate the improvement district, including the tracts to be assessed;

Describe definitely the location of the project; and

State that the special assessment is to be made upon all the tracts benefited by the project proportionately to the benefits received.

In case a special assessment is to be upon the abutting property on a frontage basis, it shall be sufficient for the resolution so to state and to define the location of the project to be made.

The resolution of the board need not describe in detail each particular tract to be assessed but may simply designate the property, improvement district, or location so that the various tracts to be assessed can be determined to be within the proposed improvement district.

The engineer shall forthwith prepare and file with the district:

The preliminary plans;

The preliminary estimate of cost; and

The assessment plat.

Upon the filing of the plans, preliminary estimate of cost, and plat, the board shall examine the same. If the board finds the plans, estimate, and plat to be satisfactory, it shall make a provisional order by resolution to the effect that the project shall be acquired, constructed, or improved.

The owner or owners of tracts to be assessed in a proposed improvement district for not less than ninety-five percent of the entire cost of a project, comprising more than fifty percent of the area of the proposed improvement district and also comprising a majority of the landowners residing in the proposed improvement district, may, by written petition, initiate the acquisition, construction, or improvement of any assessment project that the board is authorized to initiate subject to the following limitations:

The board may incorporate the project in one or more existing or alternative proposed improvement districts;

The board is not required to proceed with the construction, acquisition, or improvement of the project or any part thereof if, after holding a provisional order hearing pursuant to section 32-11.5-507, the board determines that it is not in the public interest for the proposed project or part thereof to go forward; and

A particular kind of project, material therefor, or a part thereof need not be constructed, acquired, improved, or located as provided in the petition if the board determines that it is not in the public interest.

The board is not required to take any further action regarding a petition if the board determines by resolution that the construction, acquisition, or improvement of the proposed project is probably not feasible, the resolution requires a cash deposit or a pledge of property in at least an amount designated by the board probably to be sufficient to defray the costs likely to be incurred by the board before and during the attempted acquisition, construction, or improvement of the project designated in the petition, and the deposit or pledge is not provided to the board within twenty days after mailed notice is given to the person presenting the petition or after one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the district of a notice of the resolution's adoption and of its content in summary form. The board may subsequently, as it deems necessary, require one or more additional deposits or pledges as a condition precedent to the continuation of action by the district.

Whenever a deposit or pledge is made and thereafter the board determines that acquisition, construction, or improvement of a project proposed by petition is not feasible within a reasonable period, the board may require that all or any portion of the costs incurred by the district in connection with the petition or project be defrayed from the deposit or proceeds of the pledged property unless the petitioners or other interested persons defray the costs within twenty days after the board determines the amount to be defrayed by resolution.

Any surplus moneys remaining from a deposit or pledge shall be returned by the district to the person making the same.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, upon the filing of a petition pursuant to said subsection (3), the board shall proceed in the same manner as provided in subsection (2) of this section for proceedings initiated by the board.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 864, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-503. Combination of projects.

More than one project may be combined in an improvement district if the board determines that the combination will be efficient and economical.

If projects combined in one improvement district are separate and distinct due to substantial differences in their character or location or other substantial differences, each project shall be considered as a separate assessment unit or quasi-improvement district for the purpose of petition, remonstrance, and assessment.

If projects are combined, the board shall designate the project and the area constituting each assessment unit, and, in the absence of arbitrary and capricious action or abuse of discretion, its determination that there is or is not such a combination and its determination of the project and the area constituting the assessment unit shall be final and conclusive.

The costs of acquiring, constructing, or improving each project shall be segregated for the levy of assessments, and an equitable share of the incidental costs shall be allocated to each assessment unit.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 867, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-504. Effect of estimates.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in this article, no estimate of the cost of a project required or authorized in this part 5 shall constitute a limit on the cost or a limit on the powers of the board or of any officers, agents, or employees of the district.

No assessment shall exceed the amount of the estimate of maximum special benefits from the project to any tract assessed.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 867, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-505. Fixing hearing and notice.

In a resolution constituting a provisional order pursuant to section 32-11.5-502 (2), the board shall set a time at least twenty days after the date of the resolution and a place at which the owners of the tracts to be assessed or any other interested persons may appear before the board and be heard as to the propriety and advisability of acquiring, constructing, or improving the provisionally ordered project.

Notice of the meeting required by subsection (1) of this section shall be given by publication and by mail to all owners of record of the tracts to be assessed.

The notice required by subsection (2) of this section shall include the following information:

The kind of project proposed;

The estimated cost of the project and the portion, if any, to be paid from sources other than special assessments;

The basis for apportioning the special assessments, which shall be in proportion to the special benefits derived to each of the several tracts comprising the assessable property and on a front-foot, area, zone, or other equitable basis;

The number of installments and the time in which the special assessments are payable;

The maximum rate of interest on unpaid installments of special assessments;

The area of the improvement district to be assessed;

The time and place at which the board will consider the ordering of the proposed project and hear all complaints, protests, and objections that may be made in writing and filed with the district at least three days in advance or may be made verbally at the hearing by the owner of any tract to be assessed or by any other interested person;

The fact that the description of the tracts to be assessed, the maximum amount of benefits estimated to be conferred on each tract, and all related proceedings are on file and may be examined at main offices of the district during business hours by any interested person; and

A statement that regardless of the basis used for apportioning assessments, in cases of wedge-shaped, V-shaped, or any other irregular-shaped tracts, an amount apportioned thereto shall be in proportion to the special benefits thereby derived.

The district shall maintain proof of publication and proof of mailing of the notice required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section and described in subsection (3) of this section in the records of the district until any special assessments imposed to fund the project that is the subject of the provisional order have been paid in full.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 867, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-506. Subsequent modifications.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the board may modify or rescind by resolution any board action relating to the creation of an improvement district or the imposition of special assessments at any time before adopting a resolution creating the improvement district pursuant to section 32-11.5-509 and authorizing a project to be funded in whole or in part with revenues generated by special assessments.

No substantial change in a proposed improvement district, details, preliminary plans, specifications, or estimates shall be made after the first publication or mailing of notice to property owners, whichever occurs first; except that the board may delete a portion of a project or any tract from the proposed improvement district or from any assessment unit, and the engineer may make minor changes in time, plans, and materials for a project at any time before its completion.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 868, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-507. Provisional order hearing.

At the provisional order hearing, any property owners interested in a proposed project to be funded in whole or in part with revenues generated by special assessments may present their views to the board. The board may adjourn the hearing from time to time.

If the board determines, after considering all views presented at the provisional order hearing, that it is not in the public interest that the proposed project or a portion of the proposed project go forward, the board shall order by resolution that the proceeding for the rejected project or portion shall stop. The rejected project or portion may only resume if the board adopts a new resolution.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 869, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-508. Post-hearing procedure.

After the provisional order hearing, the board shall determine whether to form the proposed improvement district and any assessment unit within the proposed improvement district.

If the board desires to form the proposed improvement district but also desires to modify the district, the board shall direct the engineer to prepare and present to the board:

A revised and detailed estimate of the total cost, including without limitation the cost of acquiring, constructing, or improving each proposed project. Unless otherwise specifically provided in this article, the revised estimate shall not constitute a limitation for any purpose.

Full and detailed plans and specifications for each proposed project designed to permit and to encourage competition among the bidders if any projects are to be acquired, constructed, or improved by construction contract; and

A revised map and assessment plat showing the location of each proposed project and the tracts to be assessed therefor.

The board, in the resolution creating the improvement district or in a separate resolution, may combine or divide the proposed projects into suitable construction units for the purpose of letting separate and independent contracts, regardless of the extent of any project constituting an assessment unit and regardless of whether or not a portion of the cost of any project is to be defrayed with revenues other than revenues generated by special assessments.

Nothing in this part 5 shall be construed as not requiring the segregation of costs of unrelated improvement programs for assessment purposes.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 869, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-509. Creation of improvement district.

When an accurate estimate of cost, full and detailed plans and specifications, and the map and assessment plat are prepared, presented, and are satisfactory to the board, regardless of whether the preliminary estimate of cost, plans and specifications, and map and assessment plat are modified pursuant to section 32-11.5-508 and any required election has been held, the board shall by resolution create the improvement district and order the proposed project to be acquired, constructed, or improved.

The resolution shall prescribe:

The extent of the improvement district and of any assessment within the improvement district by boundaries or by other brief description;

The kind and location of each proposed project;

The amount or the proportion of the total cost to be defrayed by special assessments, the method of levying special assessments, the number of installments, and the times at which special assessments will be payable; and

The character and the extent of any construction units pursuant to section 32-11.5-508 (3).

The engineer may further revise the cost, plans and specifications, and the map and assessment plat for all or any part of a project, and the board may amend the resolution creating the improvement district accordingly prior to letting any construction contract and prior to any property being acquired or any work being done other than by independent contract let by the district.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 869, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-510. Construction contracts.

No contract for construction work to acquire or improve the project contemplated shall be made or awarded nor shall the board incur any expense or any liability in relation thereto, except for maps, plats, diagrams, estimates, plans, specifications, and notices, until after the provisional order hearing and notice provided for in this part 5 have been had and given.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 870, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-511. Division of tract.

If a tract is divided after a special assessment has been levied and divided into installments and before the collection of all the installments, the board may require the county assessor to apportion the uncollected amounts upon the several parts of the tract so divided proportionally based upon their valuation for assessment for taxes. The apportionment shall be conclusive on all parties, and all subsequent assessments shall be according to the apportionment.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 870, § 1, effective April 30.